Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.200

Payment for reenactments of crimes—Contracts—Deposits—Damages.

After hearing, as provided in RCW 7.68.210, every person, firm, corporation, partnership, association, or other legal entity contracting with any person or the representative or assignee of any person, accused or convicted of a crime in this state, with respect to the reenactment of such crime, by way of a movie, book, magazine article, tape recording, phonograph record, radio or television presentation, live entertainment of any kind, or from the expression of such accused or convicted person's thoughts, feelings, opinion, or emotions regarding such crime, shall submit a copy of such contract to the department and pay over to the department any moneys which would otherwise, by terms of such contract, be owing to the person so accused or convicted or his or her representatives. The department shall deposit such moneys in an escrow account for the benefit of and payable to any victim or the legal representative of any victim of crimes committed by: (1) Such convicted person; or (2) such accused person, but only if such accused person is eventually convicted of the crime and provided that such victim, within five years of the date of the establishment of such escrow account, brings a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction and recovers a money judgment for damages against such person or his or her representatives.

[ 2011 c 336 s 248; 1979 ex.s. c 219 s 13.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 219: See note following RCW 70.125.010.